Washington statutes.
RCW 35.97.070

Municipality may shut off heat for nonpayment—Late payment charges authorized.

If prompt payment of a heating rate, charge, or rental is not made, a municipality after reasonable notice may shut off the heating supply to the building, place, or premises to which the municipality supplied the heating. A municipality may also make an additional charge for late payment.

[ 1983 c 216 s 7.]